csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: miininangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigod
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: miinineg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: miinik
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiyangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: miininang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: miinigooyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: miinigooyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: miinangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: miinangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: miinangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: miinang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: miinigooyaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: miinigooyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: miinigooyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinindwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: miinigooyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: miinigooyang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiwaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagoogoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: miinisinowaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwagwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwadwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisinowegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: miinisinowangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisinowegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: miinisinowangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: miinisinokwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: miinisinokiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: miinangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: miinigoosiwaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: miinigoosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: miinigoosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwindwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: miinigoosiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: miinigoosiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigoyaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigoyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigoyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonipan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigopan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigoyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigoyangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: miininagoogoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: miininaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: miinagwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: miinagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: miinegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: miinegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: miizhiyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: miinadwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: miinadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: miizhiyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigooyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: miininegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiyangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: miininangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigopan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhipan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigooyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: miininegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiyangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: miininangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: miinikwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: miinikiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: miinangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: miinangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: miinangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: miinangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: miinigooyaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: miinigooyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: miinigooyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinindwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: miinigooyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: miinigooyangiban
